Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6212
Inspection, defined.

Inspection shall mean the periodic examination of practitioners by a state agency in order to ascertain whether the practitioner's occupation is being carried out in a manner consistent with the public health, safety, and welfare.

Laws 1985, LB 407, § 12.